Rhode Island, session 2025, SB29.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 30-3-40.4 of the General Laws in Chapter 30-3 entitled "National
Guard" is hereby amended to read as follows:
30-3-40.4. Payment of life insurance premiums.
Any member of the national guard who has been mobilized in excess of thirty (30) days
and who elects coverage under a term life insurance policy issued by the federal government, shall
be reimbursed from the general fund for the cost of premiums incurred by the member for said
policy for any month or part thereof that the member has been mobilized. In the event that a member
of the national guard elects coverage in an amount in excess of four five hundred thousand dollars
($400,000) ($500,000) under such policy, the member shall receive reimbursement from the
general fund in an amount not to exceed the amount of the premiums attributable to the first four
five hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) ($500,000) of coverage under said policy.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000042
========